Connecticut, session 2026, HB05018.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction for the portion of any payment from an
insurance company received by a taxpayer (1) in exchange for a buyout
or cancellation of a long-term care insurance policy, and (2) that is
properly includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes.